Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB93.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1410. Revenue from expansion of gaming.(a) Deposit of revenue.--If an expansion of gaming occurs in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section, any revenue received by the Commonwealth from the expansion shall be deposited into the Property Tax Relief Fund established in section 1409 (relating to Property Tax Relief Fund).(b) Determination and publication.--(1) The Secretary of Revenue shall determine whether an expansion of gaming after the effective date of this section has occurred.123456789101112131415161718 (2) After determining that an expansion of gaming has occurred, the Secretary of Revenue shall transmit to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin a notice on the nature of the expansion of gaming. The notice shall be transmitted as soon as practicable after the determination is made.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0093PN0048 - 2 - 12345678